Hawaii, session 2026, HB1551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 11-7.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§11-7.5  Duties of the elections commission.  The duties of the elections commission are to: (1)  Hold public hearings; (2)  Investigate and hold hearings for receiving evidence of any violations and complaints; (3)  Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91; (4)  Employ, without regard to chapter 76, a full-time chief election officer, pursuant to section 11-1.6; provided that the chief election officer who passes the standard state probationary period may only be terminated for cause; (5)  Conduct a performance evaluation of the chief election officer within two months after the date a general election is certified; (6)  Hold a public hearing on the performance of the chief election officer and consider the information gathered at the hearing in deliberations on the chief election officer's reappointment; provided that the chief election officer who passes the standard state probationary period may only be terminated for cause; and (7)  Advise the chief election officer on matters relating to elections." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________